Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6614YH (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2280 Section 1. Section 422.12, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) âEmergency medical services personnel memberâ means 3 an emergency medical care provider, as defined in section 4 147A.1 , who is certified as a first responder pursuant to 5 chapter 147A , or who otherwise meets the definition of first 6 responder except for achieving certification . 7 (2) The department shall adopt criteria, by rule pursuant to 8 chapter 17A, establishing the qualifications necessary to meet 9 the definition of first responder without certification. 10 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 11 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 12 or after that date. 13